Utah statutes.
13-1-7.   Budgets.

The department shall prepare and submit to the governor a proposed budget for each division or agency within the department to be included in the budget submitted by the governor to the Legislature for the fiscal year following the convening of the Legislature in an annual general session.



Amended by Chapter 21, 1985 General Session

